Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-813
Bridge construction; yearly contracts; concrete substructures; terms.

In the event the substructure of such bridges or approaches is built wholly or in part of stone, brick, cement or concrete, the contract for the portion of the substructure to be built of such material shall be let at a specified sum per cubic foot in place.

Laws 1905, c. 126, § 3, p. 540;

R.S.1913, § 2958;

C.S.1922, § 2716;

C.S.1929, § 39-803;

R.S.1943, § 39-813.